Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Information Technology

42.720.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that:

The establishment of the position of the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology, appointed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet with the approval of the Governor, as the Commonwealth’s single point of contact and spokesperson for all matters related to information technology and resources, including policies, standard setting, deployment, strategic and tactical planning, acquisition, management, and operations is necessary and in keeping with the industry trends of the private and public sectors;

The appropriate use of information technology by the Commonwealth can improve operational productivity, reduce the cost of government, enhance service to customers, and make government more accessible to the public;

Government-wide planning, investment, protection, and direction for information resources must be enacted to:

Ensure the effective application of information technology on state business operations;

Ensure the quality, security, and integrity of state business operations; and

Provide privacy to the citizens of the Commonwealth;

The Commonwealth must provide information technology infrastructure, technical directions, and a proficient organizational management structure to facilitate the productive application of information technology and resources to accomplish programmatic missions and business goals;

Oversight of large scale and government statewide systems or projects is necessary to protect the Commonwealth’s investment and to ensure appropriate integration with existing or planned systems;

A career development plan and professional development program for information technology staff of the executive branch is needed to provide key competencies and adequate on-going support for the information resources of the Commonwealth and to ensure that the information technology staff will be managed as a Commonwealth resource;

The Commonwealth is in need of information technology advisory capacities to the Governor and the agencies of the executive cabinet;

Appropriate public-private partnerships to supplement existing resources must be developed as a strategy for the Commonwealth to comprehensively meet its spectrum of information technology and resource needs;

Technological and theoretical advances in information use are recent in origin, immense in scope and complexity, and change at a rapid rate, which presents Kentucky with the opportunity to provide higher quality, more timely, and more cost-effective government services to ensure standardization, interoperability, and interconnectivity;

The sharing of information resources and technologies among executive branch state agencies is the most cost-effective method of providing the highest quality and most timely government services that would otherwise be cost-prohibitive;

The ability to identify, develop, and implement changes in a rapidly moving field demands the development of mechanisms to provide for the research and development of technologies that address systems, uses, and applications; and

The exercise by the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology of powers and authority conferred by KRS

42.720

to

42.742

,

45.253

,

171.420

,

186A.040

, and

186A.285

shall be deemed and held to be the performance of essential governmental functions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 353, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2000, ch. 506, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 21, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2020 ch. 36, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

42.722.
Definitions for KRS 42.720 to 42.742.

As used in KRS

42.720

to

42.742

:

“Communications” or “telecommunications” means any transmission, emission, or reception of signs, signals, writings, images, and sounds of intelligence of any nature by wire, radio, optical, or other electromagnetic systems, and includes all facilities and equipment performing these functions;

“Geographic information system” or “GIS” means a computerized database management system for the capture, storage, retrieval, analysis, and display of spatial or locationally defined data;

“Information resources” means the procedures, equipment, and software that are designed, built, operated, and maintained to collect, record, process, store, retrieve, display, and transmit information, and associated personnel;

“Information technology” means data processing and telecommunications hardware, software, services, supplies, facilities, maintenance, and training that are used to support information processing and telecommunications systems to include geographic information systems;

“Personal information” has the same meaning as in KRS

61.931

;

“Project” means a program to provide information technologies support to functions within an executive branch state agency, which should be characterized by well-defined parameters, specific objectives, common benefits, planned activities, expected outcomes and completion dates, and an established budget with a specified source of funding;

“Security breach” has the same meaning as in KRS

61.931

; and

“Technology infrastructure” means any computing equipment, servers, networks, storage, desktop support, telephony, enterprise shared systems, information technology security, disaster recovery, business continuity, database administration, and software licensing.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 506, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2014, ch. 89, § 9, effective July 15, 2014; ch. 138, § 2, effective July 15, 2014, ch. 74, § 5, effective January 1, 2015.

Compiler’s Notes

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

11.503

.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2015). 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 74, sec. 10 provided that “the provisions of this Act shall not impact the provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.” That proviso applies to this statute as amended in Section 5 of that Act.

(1/1/2015) This statute was amended by 2014 Ky. Acts chs. 74, 89, and 138, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

42.724.
Commonwealth Office of Technology.

There is hereby created within the Finance and Administration Cabinet an agency of state government known as the Commonwealth Office of Technology.

The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall be headed by an executive director, also known as the chief information officer, appointed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and approved by the Governor. Duties and functions of the executive director shall include serving on the Governor’s Executive Cabinet and those established in KRS

42.730

.

The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall consist of the following offices, each headed by an executive director and organized into divisions headed by a division director:

Office of Infrastructure Services, consisting of the:

Division of Network Services; and

Division of Platform Services;

Office of Architecture and Governance, consisting of the:

Division of Enterprise Solutions;

Division of Mainframe Services;

Division of Geographic Information Systems; and

Division of Governance and Strategy;

Office of the Chief Information Security Officer. The office shall ensure the efficiency and effectiveness of information technology security functions and responsibilities; and

Office of Client Support Services, consisting of the:

Division of Field Services; and

Division of Support Services.

Executive directors and division directors appointed under this section shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 506, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 59, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2005, ch. 85, § 22, effective June 20, 2005; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 4, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 69, § 8, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 89, § 10, effective July 15, 2014; ch. 138, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 78, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 81, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

42.726.
Roles, duties, and permissible activities for Commonwealth Office of Technology — Duties of Archives and Records Commission and Department for Libraries and Archives not affected — Annual report concerning security breaches.

The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall be the lead organizational entity within the executive branch regarding delivery of information technology services, including application development and delivery, and shall serve as the single information technology authority for the Commonwealth.

The roles and duties of the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall include but not be limited to:

Providing technical support and services to all executive agencies of state government in the application of information technology;

Assuring compatibility and connectivity of Kentucky’s information systems;

Developing strategies and policies to support and promote the effective applications of information technology within state government as a means of saving money, increasing employee productivity, and improving state services to the public, including electronic public access to information of the Commonwealth;

Developing, implementing, and managing strategic information technology directions, standards, and enterprise architecture, including implementing necessary management processes to ensure full compliance with those directions, standards, and architecture;

Promoting effective and efficient design and operation of all major information resources management processes for executive branch agencies, including improvements to work processes;

Developing, implementing, and maintaining the technology infrastructure of the Commonwealth and all related support staff, planning, administration, asset management, and procurement for all executive branch cabinets and agencies except:

Agencies led by a statewide elected official;

The nine (9) public institutions of postsecondary education;

The Department of Education’s services provided to local school districts;

The Kentucky Retirement Systems, the County Employees Retirement System, the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority, and the Teachers’ Retirement System;

The Kentucky Housing Corporation;

The Kentucky Lottery Corporation;

The Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation; and

The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;

Facilitating and fostering applied research in emerging technologies that offer the Commonwealth innovative business solutions;

Reviewing and overseeing large or complex information technology projects and systems for compliance with statewide strategies, policies, and standards, including alignment with the Commonwealth’s business goals, investment, and other risk management policies. The executive director is authorized to grant or withhold approval to initiate these projects;

Integrating information technology resources to provide effective and supportable information technology applications in the Commonwealth;

Establishing the central statewide geographic information clearinghouse to maintain map inventories, information on current and planned geographic information systems applications, information on grants available for the acquisition or enhancement of geographic information resources, and a directory of geographic information resources available within the state or from the federal government;

Coordinating multiagency information technology projects, including overseeing the development and maintenance of statewide base maps and geographic information systems;

Providing access to both consulting and technical assistance, and education and training, on the application and use of information technologies to state and local agencies;

In cooperation with other agencies, evaluating, participating in pilot studies, and making recommendations on information technology hardware and software;

Providing staff support and technical assistance to the Geographic Information Advisory Council and the Kentucky Information Technology Advisory Council;

Overseeing the development of a statewide geographic information plan with input from the Geographic Information Advisory Council;

Developing for state executive branch agencies a coordinated security framework and model governance structure relating to the privacy and confidentiality of personal information collected and stored by state executive branch agencies, including but not limited to:

Identification of key infrastructure components and how to secure them;

Establishment of a common benchmark that measures the effectiveness of security, including continuous monitoring and automation of defenses;

Implementation of vulnerability scanning and other security assessments;

Provision of training, orientation programs, and other communications that increase awareness of the importance of security among agency employees responsible for personal information; and

Development of and making available a cyber security incident response plan and procedure; and

Preparing proposed legislation and funding proposals for the General Assembly that will further solidify coordination and expedite implementation of information technology systems.

The Commonwealth Office of Technology may:

Provide general consulting services, technical training, and support for generic software applications, upon request from a local government, if the executive director finds that the requested services can be rendered within the established terms of the federally approved cost allocation plan;

Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A necessary for the implementation of KRS

42.720

to

42.742

,

45.253

,

171.420

,

186A.040

, and

186A.285

;

Solicit, receive, and consider proposals from any state agency, federal agency, local government, university, nonprofit organization, private person, or corporation;

Solicit and accept money by grant, gift, donation, bequest, legislative appropriation, or other conveyance to be held, used, and applied in accordance with KRS

42.720

to

42.742

,

45.253

,

171.420

,

186A.040

, and

186A.285

;

Make and enter into memoranda of agreement and contracts necessary or incidental to the performance of duties and execution of its powers, including but not limited to agreements or contracts with the United States, other state agencies, and any governmental subdivision of the Commonwealth;

Accept grants from the United States government and its agencies and instrumentalities, and from any source, other than any person, firm, or corporation, or any director, officer, or agent thereof that manufactures or sells information resources technology equipment, goods, or services. To these ends, the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall have the power to comply with those conditions and execute those agreements that are necessary, convenient, or desirable; and

Purchase interest in contractual services, rentals of all types, supplies, materials, equipment, and other services to be used in the research and development of beneficial applications of information resources technologies. Competitive bids may not be required for:

New and emerging technologies as approved by the executive director or her or his designee; or

Related professional, technical, or scientific services, but contracts shall be submitted in accordance with KRS

45A.690

to

45A.725

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter or diminish the provisions of KRS

171.410

to

171.740

or the authority conveyed by these statutes to the Archives and Records Commission and the Department for Libraries and Archives.

The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall, on or before October 1 of each year, submit to the Legislative Research Commission a report in accordance with KRS

57.390

detailing:

Any security breaches that occurred within organizational units of the executive branch of state government during the prior fiscal year that required notification to the Commonwealth Office of Technology under KRS

61.932

;

Actions taken to resolve the security breach, and to prevent additional security breaches in the future;

A general description of what actions are taken as a matter of course to protect personal data from security breaches; and

Any quantifiable financial impact to the agency reporting a security breach.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 506, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 30, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 4, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 193, § 10, effective July 12, 2006; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 69, § 9, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 89, § 11, effective July 15, 2014; ch. 138, § 4, effective July 15, 2014; ch 74, § 6, effective January 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 78, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 36, § 3, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 79, § 16, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 229, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Compiler’s Notes

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

11.507

.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2015). 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 74, sec. 10 provided that “the provisions of this Act shall not impact the provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.” That proviso applies to this statute as amended in Section 6 of that Act.

(7/15/2014). This statute was amended by 2014 Ky. Acts chs. 89, sec. 11, and 138, sec. 4, which are identical and have been codified together.

42.728.
State agencies to assist Commonwealth Office of Technology — Exceptions for judicial and legislative branches and retirement systems.

To accomplish the work of the Commonwealth Office of Technology, all organizational units and administrative bodies, as defined in KRS

12.010

, and all members of the state postsecondary education system, as defined in KRS

164.001

, shall furnish the Commonwealth Office of Technology necessary assistance, resources, information, records, and advice as required.

The provisions of KRS

42.720

to

42.742

,

45.253

,

171.420

,

186A.040

, and

186A.285

shall not be construed to grant any authority over the judicial or legislative branches of state government, or agencies thereof, to the Commonwealth Office of Technology.

The information, technology, personnel, agency resources, and confidential records of the Kentucky Retirement Systems, the County Employees Retirement System, the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority, and the Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System shall be excluded from the provisions of KRS

42.720

to

42.742

,

45.253

,

171.420

,

186A.040

, and

186A.285

and shall not be under the authority of the Commonwealth Office of Technology.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 506, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 31, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 6, effective June 25, 2009; 2020 ch. 36, § 4, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 79, § 17, effective April 1, 2021.

42.730.
Executive Director of Commonwealth Office of Technology — Roles and duties.

The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall be the principal adviser to the Governor and the executive cabinet on information technology policy, including policy on the acquisition and management of information technology and resources.

The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall also serve as the chief information officer for all agencies within the executive branch, including the Commonwealth Office of Technology.

The executive director shall carry out functions necessary for the efficient, effective, and economical administration of information technology and resources within the executive branch. Roles and duties of the executive director shall include but not be limited to:

Assessing, recommending, and implementing information technology governance and organization design to include effective information technology personnel management practices;

Integrating information technology and resources plans with agency business plans;

Overseeing shared Commonwealth information technology resources and services;

Performing as the focal point and representative for the Commonwealth in information technology and related areas with both the public and private sector;

Establishing appropriate partnerships and alliances to support the effective implementation of information technology projects in the Commonwealth;

Identifying information technology applications that should be statewide in scope, and assisting agencies in avoiding duplicate services;

Establishing performance measurement and benchmarking policies and procedures;

Preparing annual reports and plans concerning the status and result of the state’s specific information technology plans and submitting these annual reports and plans to the Governor and the General Assembly;

Managing the Commonwealth Office of Technology and its budget; and

Approving technology acquisition prior to any procurement.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 353, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2000, ch. 506, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 23, effective June 20, 2005; repealed and reenact., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 7, effective June 25, 2009; 2011, ch. 75, § 3, effective March 16, 2011; 2018 ch. 78, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

11.511

.

42.732.
Kentucky Information Technology Advisory Council — Purposes — Members.

There is hereby created the Kentucky Information Technology Advisory Council to:

Advise the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology on approaches to coordinating information technology solutions among libraries, public schools, local governments, universities, and other public entities;

Advise the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology on coordination among and across the organizational units of the executive branch of state government to prepare for, respond to, and prevent attacks; and

Provide a forum for the discussion of emerging technologies that enhance electronic accessibility to various publicly funded sources of information and services.

The Kentucky Information Technology Advisory Council shall consist of:

The state budget director or a designee;

The state librarian or a designee;

One (1) representative from the public universities to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the Council on Postsecondary Education;

Three (3) citizen members from the private sector with information technology knowledge and experience appointed by the Governor;

Two (2) representatives of local government appointed by the Governor;

One (1) representative from the area development districts appointed by the Governor from a list of names submitted by the executive directors of the area development districts;

One (1) member of the media appointed by the Governor;

The executive director of the Kentucky Authority for Educational Television;

The chair of the Public Service Commission or a designee;

Two (2) members of the Kentucky General Assembly, one (1) from each chamber, selected by the Legislative Research Commission;

One (1) representative of the Administrative Office of the Courts;

One (1) representative from the public schools system appointed by the Governor;

One (1) representative of the Kentucky Chamber of Commerce;

The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology; and

The executive director of the Kentucky Communications Network Authority or designee.

Appointed members of the council shall serve for a term of two (2) years. Members who serve by virtue of an office shall serve on the council while they hold the office.

Vacancies on the council shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. If a nominating organization changes its name, its successor organization having the same responsibilities and purposes shall be the nominating organization.

Members shall receive no compensation but shall receive reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses in accordance with travel and subsistence requirements established by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 506, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; ch. 5236, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 32, effective June 20, 2005; repealed and reenacted., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 8, effective June 25, 2009; 2014, ch. 74, § 7, effective January 1, 2015.; 2017 ch. 89, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

11.513

.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2015). 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 74, sec. 10 provided that “the provisions of this Act shall not impact the provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.” That proviso applies to this statute as amended in Section 7 of that Act.

42.734.
Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee created.

The Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee is hereby created to address communications interoperability, a homeland security issue which is critical to the ability of public safety first responders to communicate with each other by radio. The committee shall advise and make recommendations to the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology regarding strategic wireless initiatives to achieve public safety voice and data communications interoperability.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 164, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 85, § 34, effective June 20, 2005; repealed and reenact., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 10, effective June 25, 2009.

42.736.
Definitions for KRS 42.734, 42.736, and 42.738.

As used in this section and KRS

42.734

and

42.738

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Architecture” means the design principles, physical structure, and functional organization of a land mobile radio system;

“Frequency” means for a periodic function, the number of cycles or events per unit time that comprises the frequency spectrum used by or assigned to a wireless public safety voice or data communications system;

“Interoperability” means:

The ability of public safety agencies to be able to communicate with one another; to exchange voice or data with one another in real time;

The ability of systems, units, or forces to provide services to and accept services from other systems, units, or forces and to use the services so exchanged to enable them to operate effectively together; and

The condition achieved among communications-electronics systems or items of communications-electronic equipment when information or services can be exchanged directly and satisfactorily between them and their users;

“Primary wireless public safety voice or data communications systems” means a regular interacting group of base, mobile, and associated control and fixed relay stations intended to provide land mobile radio voice or data communications service over a single area of operation for public safety agencies. This definition shall not include “911” telephone systems;

“Public safety shared infrastructure” means any component that by the nature of its function or physical characteristics can be used by multiple agencies to implement or support primary wireless public safety voice or data communications systems. This shall include but not be limited to towers, equipment shelters, radios, and other electronic equipment, backbone communications networks, and communications-related software;

“Public safety working group” means a working group whose mission is to design and develop a seamless coordinated plan for the use of the public safety frequency spectrum as regulated by the Federal Communications Commission;

“Spectrum” means a usable radio frequency in the electromagnetic distribution; and

“Standards” means:

Engineering and technical requirements that are necessary to be employed in the design of systems, units, or forces and to use the services so exchanged to enable them to operate effectively together, including but not limited to operating frequencies, over-the-air protocols, and bandwidth; and

Established protocol that provides a common interface.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 164, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 48, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 11, effective June 25, 2009.

42.738.
Statewide public safety interoperability plan — Annual report by executive director— Duties of Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee — Membership — Public Safety Working Group.

The executive director shall establish and implement a statewide public safety interoperability plan. This plan shall include the development of required architecture and standards that will insure that new or upgraded Commonwealth public safety communications systems will interoperate. The Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee shall be responsible for the evaluation and recommendation of all wireless communications architecture, standards, and strategies. The executive director shall provide direction, stewardship, leadership, and general oversight of information technology and information resources. The executive director shall report by September 15 annually to the Interim Joint Committee on Seniors, Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection and the Interim Joint Committee on State Government on progress and activity by agencies of the Commonwealth to comply with standards to achieve public safety communications interoperability.

The Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee shall serve as the advisory body for all wireless communications strategies presented by agencies of the Commonwealth and local governments. All state agencies in the Commonwealth shall present all project plans for primary wireless public safety voice or data communications systems for review and recommendation by the committee, and the committee shall forward the plans to the executive director for final approval. Local government entities shall present project plans for primary wireless public safety voice or data communications systems for review and recommendation by the Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee.

The committee shall develop funding and support plans that provide for the maintenance of and technological upgrades to the public safety shared infrastructure, and shall make recommendations to the executive director, the Governor’s Office for Policy and Management, and the General Assembly.

The executive director shall examine the project plans for primary wireless public safety voice or data communications systems of state agencies as required by subsection (2) of this section, and shall determine whether they meet the required architecture and standards for primary wireless public safety voice or data communications systems.

The Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee shall consist of twenty (20) members as follows:

A person knowledgeable in the field of wireless communications appointed by the executive director who shall serve as chair;

The executive director of the Office of Infrastructure Services, Commonwealth Office of Technology;

The executive director of Kentucky Educational Television, or the executive director’s designee;

The information technology lead of the Transportation Cabinet;

The information technology lead of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

The information technology lead of the Department of Kentucky State Police;

The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, or the commissioner’s designee;

The information technology lead of the Energy and Environment Cabinet;

The director of the Division of Emergency Management, Department of Military Affairs;

The executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security;

The information technology lead of the Department for Public Health, Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

A representative from an institution of postsecondary education appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the president of the Council on Postsecondary Education;

The executive director of the Center for Rural Development, or the executive director’s designee;

A representative from a municipal government to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities;

A representative from a county government to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of Counties;

A representative from a municipal police department to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of Chiefs of Police;

A representative from a local fire department to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of Fire Chiefs;

A representative from a county sheriff’s department to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Sheriffs’ Association;

A representative from a local Emergency Medical Services agency to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services; and

A representative from a local 911 dispatch center to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Chapter of the National Emergency Number Association/Association of Public Safety Communications Officials.

Appointed members of the committee shall serve for a two (2) year term. Members who serve by virtue of an office shall serve on the committee while they hold that office.

The committee shall meet quarterly, or as often as necessary for the conduct of its business. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Members’ designees shall have voting privileges at committee meetings.

The committee shall be attached to the Commonwealth Office of Technology for administrative purposes only. Members shall not be paid and shall not be reimbursed for travel expenses.

The Public Safety Working Group is hereby created for the primary purpose of fostering cooperation, planning, and development of the public safety frequency spectrum as regulated by the Federal Communications Commission, including the 700 MHz public safety band. The group shall endeavor to bring about a seamless, coordinated, and integrated public safety communications network for the safe, effective, and efficient protection of life and property. The Public Safety Working Group membership and other working group memberships deemed necessary shall be appointed by the chair of the Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee.

The committee may establish additional working groups as determined by the committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 164, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 48, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 35, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 95, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 74, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 193, § 8, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 6, effective June 26, 2007; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 12, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 34, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 78, § 5, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 81, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.